Massachusetts, session 194th, H1545.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 30 of chapter 23B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words "no other children" in line 3 the
following words:-
",and individuals with disabilities as defined by chapter 179 of the acts of 1995 who
require home care, caretaker services, and constant stay and housing, and the elderly".
SECTION 2. Section 30 of chapter 23B is further amended after subsection (F) by adding
the following subsection:-
"(G) The department shall provide shelter in the form of a hotel or motel to an individual
with a disability as defined by chapter 179 of the acts of 1995 who requires home care, caretaker
services, and constant stay and housing and who requires a reasonable accommodation which
cannot be provided at overnight shelters."
of 1